test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiinsminwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsminwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiinyminaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinyminaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyminaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiinsminaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsminaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsminaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinyminaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinyminaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyminaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinymiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinymiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinsminaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsminaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsminaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiinymiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiinymiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiinymiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+4: miskweyaabiinyminwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiinyminiing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiinyminwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiinsmiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+4: miskweyaabiinsminwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiinsminiing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiinsminwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinymibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinymibniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinymibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinsmibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsmibniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsmibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinymibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinymibniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinsmibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsmibniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinymibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinymibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinymibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsmibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinymibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinymibniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinymibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsmibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmibniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyshinaandig
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsshinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyshinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaadig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsshinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiinyshiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiinyshinwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshinwidig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiinsshiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiinsshinwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinyshinaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsshinaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinyshinaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsshinaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiinyshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiinyshiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+4: miskweyaabiinyshinwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiinyshiniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshinwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiinsshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: miskweyaabiinsshinwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshiniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinyshibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinyshibniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyshibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinsshibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsshibniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsshibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinyshibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinyshibniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyshibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinsshibniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsshibniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsshibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinyshibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinyshibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsshibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinyshibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinyshibniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinyshibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsshibniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsshibniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinywaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinywaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinywaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinswaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinswaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinswaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinywaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinywaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinywaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinyniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinyniwbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinyniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinswaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinswaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinswaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsniwbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsniwbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiimshiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimshiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiimshinwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiimshinaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimshinaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiimshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiimshiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiimshiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: miskweyaabiimshinwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiimshiniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiimshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
